Utah statutes.
19-6-105.   Rules of board.

(1)  The board may make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act:

(a)  establishing minimum standards for protection of human health and the environment, for the storage, collection, transport, recovery, treatment, and disposal of solid waste, including requirements for the approval by the director of plans for the construction, extension, operation, and closure of solid waste disposal sites;

(b)  identifying wastes which are determined to be hazardous, including wastes designated as hazardous under Sec. 3001 of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, 42 U.S.C., Sec. 6921, et seq.;

(c)  governing generators and transporters of hazardous wastes and owners and operators of hazardous waste treatment, storage, and disposal facilities, including requirements for keeping records, monitoring, submitting reports, and using a manifest, without treating high-volume wastes such as cement kiln dust, mining wastes, utility waste, gas and oil drilling muds, and oil production brines in a manner more stringent than they are treated under federal standards;

(d)  requiring an owner or operator of a treatment, storage, or disposal facility that is subject to a plan approval under Section 19-6-108 or which received waste after July 26, 1982, to take appropriate corrective action or other response measures for releases of hazardous waste or hazardous waste constituents from the facility, including releases beyond the boundaries of the facility;

(e)  specifying the terms and conditions under which the director shall approve, disapprove, revoke, or review hazardous wastes operation plans;

(f)  governing public hearings and participation under this part;

(g)  establishing standards governing underground storage tanks, in accordance with Title 19, Chapter 6, Part 4, Underground Storage Tank Act;

(h)  relating to the collection, transportation, processing, treatment, storage, and disposal of infectious waste in health facilities in accordance with the requirements of Section 19-6-106;

(i)  defining closure plans as major or minor;

(j)  defining modification plans as major or minor; and

(k)  prohibiting refuse, offal, garbage, dead animals, decaying vegetable matter, or organic waste substance of any kind to be thrown, or remain upon or in any street, road, ditch, canal, gutter, public place, private premises, vacant lot, watercourse, lake, pond, spring, or well.

(2)  If any of the following are determined to be hazardous waste and are therefore subjected to the provisions of this part, the board shall, in the case of landfills or surface impoundments that receive the solid wastes, take into account the special characteristics of the wastes, the practical difficulties associated with applying requirements for other wastes to the wastes, and site specific characteristics, including the climate, geology, hydrology, and soil chemistry at the site, if the modified requirements assure protection of human health and the environment and are no more stringent than federal standards applicable to wastes:

(a)  solid waste from the extraction, beneficiation, or processing of ores and minerals, including phosphate rock and overburden from the mining of uranium;

(b)  fly ash waste, bottom ash waste, slag waste, and flue gas emission control waste generated primarily from the combustion of coal or other fossil fuels; and

(c)  cement kiln dust waste.

(3)  The board shall establish criteria for siting commercial hazardous waste treatment, storage, and disposal facilities, including commercial hazardous waste incinerators.  Those criteria shall apply to any facility or incinerator for which plan approval is required under Section 19-6-108.

